California, session 20252026, AB1818.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3572 of the Government Code is amended to read:3572. This section shall apply only to the California State University.(a) The duty to meet and confer in good faith requires the parties to begin negotiations prior to before the adoption of the final budget for the ensuing year sufficiently in advance of the adoption date so that there is adequate time for agreement to be reached, or for the resolution of an impasse. The California State University shall maintain close liaison with the Department of Finance and the Legislature relative to the meeting and conferring on provisions of the written memoranda that have fiscal ramifications. The Governor shall appoint one representative to attend the meeting and conferring, including the impasse procedure, to advise the parties on the views of the Governor on matters that would require an appropriation or legislative action, and the Speaker of the Assembly and the Senate Committee on Rules may each appoint one representative to attend the meeting and conferring to advise the parties on the views of the Legislature on matters that would require an appropriation or legislative action.(b) No written memoranda reached pursuant to this chapter that require budgetary or curative action by the Legislature or other funding agencies shall be effective unless and until that action has been taken. Following execution of written memoranda of understanding, an appropriate request for financing or budgetary funding for all state-funded employees or for necessary legislation shall be forwarded promptly to the Legislature and the Governor or other funding agencies. When memoranda require a memorandum requires legislative action pursuant to this section, if the Legislature or the Governor fails to fully fund the memoranda memorandum or to take the requisite curative action, as determined by written notification from the Director of Finance board to the parties, the entire memoranda memorandum shall be referred back to the parties for further meeting and conferring unless the parties agree that provisions of the memoranda memorandum that are nonbudgetary and do not require funding shall take effect whether or not the funding requests submitted to the Legislature are approved.